Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Capital Projects and Bonds
45.795.
Determinations to be made in reviewing projects — Request for Legislative Research Commission to seek injunction.

In reviewing a project, the committee shall determine whether the project has met all the relevant requirements of:

KRS

45.750

to

45.816

;

KRS

56.800

to

56.823

; and

Any other statutes relating to the committee’s oversight of:

Capital projects;

The allotment and expenditure of funds from the emergency repair, maintenance, and replacement account and the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account;

The state’s acquisition of capital assets, including the lease of real property;

The issuance of bonds by the Commonwealth, and the related individual projects; and

Bonds issued by or on behalf of local school districts.

If the committee determines that any of the requirements in subsection (1) of this section have not been met, the committee may, by majority vote, request that the Legislative Research Commission file a civil court proceeding to seek an injunction to prohibit further action on the capital project, the acquisition of the capital asset, the initiation or modification of the lease of real property, the bond issue, or the allotment or expenditure of funds from the capital construction emergency or contingency accounts.

The committee may take action requesting the Legislative Research Commission to seek an injunction before, during, or after its compliance with the provisions of KRS 45.800(2) or KRS 45.810(3), where applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 23, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.800.
Prerequisites to transfer of money from contingency account or other sources.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS 45.770(2)(b), prior to transferring funds from any source to the allotment account of a capital construction project or major item of equipment, the relevant entity head, or his designee, shall present to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting, for its review, specification of the amount of the proposed transfer, documentation of the necessity for the transfer, and, with respect to capital construction projects, documentation of:

The amount already expended on the project prior to and during the current biennium; and

Any alterations made or planned in the project since its consideration by the General Assembly during the most recent even-numbered-year regular session.

Within thirty (30) days after submission to the committee of a proposed capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account transfer, the committee shall determine whether the amount of the proposed transfer is reasonable and consistent with KRS

45.770

, whether the proposed transfer is necessary, and whether any alterations made or planned in a project materially change the project as considered and authorized by the General Assembly. If the committee does not approve a proposed transfer or other proposed action, the committee, unless the Legislative Research Commission directs otherwise, shall promptly transmit its findings and determination to the head of the entity that presented the proposal.

If the committee does not approve a proposed transfer or other proposed action, the transfer shall not be made nor the action taken unless the relevant entity head, or his designee, shall:

Revise the transfer or action to comply with the objections of the committee;

Cancel the transfer or action; or

Determine to make the transfer or take the action not approved by the committee.

The decision made by the relevant entity head, or his designee, under the preceding subsection shall be communicated to the committee in writing within thirty (30) days of the committee’s not approving the proposed transfer or other proposed action.

The committee, unless the Legislative Research Commission directs otherwise, shall maintain records of its findings and determinations and the relevant entity head’s, or his designee’s, report of his action on each proposed transfer from the capital construction and equipment purchase contingency account. If the committee determines that the amount of a proposed transfer is not reasonable or is not consistent with KRS

45.770

, or that the transfer is not necessary, or if the committee finds that any alteration in a project materially changes the project as considered and approved by the General Assembly, the committee’s determination and the action of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or other appropriate entity head, on the transfer shall be transmitted to the appropriate interim joint committees of the Legislative Research Commission and to the General Assembly when next convened.

The committee, unless the Legislative Research Commission directs otherwise, shall maintain reports of purchases made under KRS

45.760

(5), reports of transfers made under KRS

45.760

to this section, reports of transfers made from the emergency repair, maintenance, and replacement account, and a record of any committee finding or recommendation relating to such purchases and transfers.

The committee shall monitor the costs of state capital construction projects in comparison with the costs of construction for the private sector to determine whether the costs are comparable and, if not comparable, the reasons for any difference. The committee shall consider contractors’ charges to the state, land acquisition costs, costs and availability of materials, cost and availability of labor, and laws, regulations, and purchasing procedures pertaining to state capital construction projects that are not applicable to construction for the private sector. The committee’s findings and recommendations shall be transmitted to the appropriate interim joint committee of the Legislative Research Commission and to the General Assembly when convened.

History.

Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 6, effective July 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 300, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 47, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 2001, ch. 58, § 22, effective June 21, 2001; 2009, ch. 78, § 33, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/2/97). 1990 Ky. Acts ch. 30, sec. 3 renumbered the former subsection (10) of KRS

45.760

as subsection (12), but that Act failed to include a conforming amendment to change the reference to that subsection in subsection (6) of this statute. Under KRS 7.136(1)(e), that change has now been made.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.810.
Procedure for review of proposed bond issue — Annual report to committee.

Any state agency authorized to issue bonds shall, prior to the issuance of any bonds, submit the proposed bond issue to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee, at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting, for review and recommendation. The Turnpike Authority shall be exempt from this review.

The Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee shall require documentation of the following:

That the proposed bond project or subsequent use of bond funds is in compliance with all applicable regulatory or statutory provisions;

That the debt service fund source has been identified and approved by all applicable authorities as provided by statute; and

That the bond issue, if supported by appropriation, is consistent with the branch budget bill.

If the committee does not recommend a proposed project for the use of bond proceeds as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the project shall be referred to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, who shall:

Revise the project in consideration of the committee’s objections; or

Cancel the project or the use of bond proceeds for the project; or

Determine to proceed with the project.

The decision of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet with respect to the project or the bond funding for the project shall be transmitted to the committee within thirty (30) days.

Any changes in the bond project after review and approval by the committee shall be transmitted to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the committee.

The bonding authorities designated in subsection (1) of this section shall submit an annual report to the committee at the end of each fiscal year, which shall include:

The principal amount of the bonds outstanding at the beginning of the fiscal year;

The amount of any bonds issued during the fiscal year;

All payments of principal, interest, trustee fees, and any other fees, during the fiscal year; and

The principal balance of bonds outstanding at the end of the fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 145, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 47, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 387, § 22, effective July 15, 1994.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, J, 1, (7) at 1692.

45.812.
Listing of costs relating to issuance of revenue bonds authorized by appropriation of school district.

Prior to the issuance of the revenue bonds or notes authorized by an appropriation of the General Assembly, or by or on behalf of any Kentucky school district, the agency, corporation, or school district authorized to issue the bonds or notes shall furnish to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, and make available to the public, a listing of all costs associated, either directly or indirectly, with the issuance of the revenue bonds or notes. The costs shall be itemized as to amount and name of payee, and shall include fees or commissions paid to, or anticipated to be paid to, issuers, underwriters, placement agents and advisors, financial advisors, remarketing agents, credit enhancers, trustees, accountants, and the counsel of all these persons, bond counsel, and special tax counsel, and shall include the economic benefits received or anticipated to be received by any other persons from any source in return for services performed relating to the issuance of the bonds or notes. Changes in amounts or names of payees or recipients, or additions of amounts or names of payees or recipients, to the listing furnished and made available pursuant to this subsection, shall be furnished to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and made available to the public within three (3) days following the change.

The costs required to be furnished under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not include the payment of wages or expenses to full-time, permanent employees of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 295, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

45.814.
Itemized listing of costs associated with issuance of revenue bonds or notes authorized by branch budget bill.

Prior to the issuance of the revenue bonds or notes authorized by a branch budget bill, the agency authorized to issue the bonds or notes shall furnish to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, and make available to the public, a listing of all costs associated, either directly or indirectly, with the issuance of the revenue bonds or notes. The costs shall be itemized as to amount and name of payee, and shall include fees or commissions paid to, or anticipated to be paid to issuers, underwriters, placement agents and advisors, financial advisors, remarketing agents, credit enhancers, trustees, accountants, and the counsel of all these persons, bond counsel, and special tax counsel, and shall include the economic benefits received or anticipated to be received by any other persons from any source in return for services performed relating to the issuance of the bonds or notes. Changes in amounts or names of payees or recipients, or additions of amounts or names of payees or recipients, to the listing furnished and made available pursuant to this section shall be furnished to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and made available to the public within three (3) days following the change.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 365, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 387, § 23, effective July 15, 1994.

45.816.
Listing of costs relating to issuance of revenue bonds by state agency.

Prior to the issuance of the revenue bonds or notes, the agency authorized to issue the bonds or notes shall furnish to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, and make available to the public, a listing of all costs associated, either directly or indirectly, with the issuance of the revenue bonds or notes. The costs shall be itemized as to amount and name of payee, and shall include fees or commissions paid to, or anticipated to be paid to, issuers, underwriters, placement agents and advisors, financial advisors, remarketing agents, credit enhancers, trustees, accountants, and the counsel of all such persons, bond counsel and special tax counsel, and shall include the economic benefits received or anticipated to be received by any other persons from any source in return for services performed relating to the issuance of the bonds or notes. Changes in amounts or names of payees or recipients, or additions of amounts or names of payees or recipients, to the listing furnished and made available pursuant to this section, shall be furnished to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and made available to the public within three (3) days following the change.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 105, § 54, effective July 14, 1992.

45.818.
Status report on information technology systems.

The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall provide to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee at its January, April, July, and October regular meetings a status report on any information technology system not yet completed which received line item authorization by the Kentucky General Assembly or was authorized pursuant to KRS 45.760(7), excluding systems of an institution as defined under KRS

164.001

. The committee shall prescribe data elements to be included in the quarterly status reports.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 328, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 67, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 78, § 34, effective June 25, 2009.